District of Columbia statutes.
6-1041.06

Ineligibility of students.

Notwithstanding § 2-1402.21, a person enrolled as full-time student in a college or university shall not be eligible to apply to rent or purchase an inclusionary unit unless the annual income of his or her parent or guardian would qualify under the eligibility standards established by the Mayor, or unless the student is a part of a household that otherwise qualifies for the inclusionary unit.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-275, § 106, 54 DCR 880
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 161(b), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section heading.